Hawaii statutes.
§386-7 Interstate and foreign commerce and
maritime employment. To the extent permissible under the Constitution and
the laws of the United States, this chapter shall apply to employees and
employers engaged in interstate and foreign commerce and to employees in
maritime employment and their employers not otherwise provided for by the laws
of the United States. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-7; HRS §386-7]

Case Notes

Employment of all decedents, circumstances of death, and
purpose of mission bore significant relationship to traditional maritime
activity. 557 F. Supp. 1024 (1983).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next